Idaho statutes. Title 9 EVIDENCE
Chapter 5
INDISPENSABLE EVIDENCE — STATUTE
OF FRAUDS

Sec.

§ 9-501. Perjury and treason.

Perjury and treason must be proved by testimony of more than one (1) witness. Treason by the testimony of two witnesses to the same overt act; and perjury by the testimony of two (2) witnesses, or one (1) witness and corroborating circumstances.

§ 9-502. Wills to be in writing.

A last will and testament, except a nuncupative will, is invalid unless it be in writing and executed with such formalities as are required by law. When, therefore, such a will is to be shown, the instrument itself must be produced, or secondary evidence of its contents be given.

§ 9-503. Transfers of real property to be in writing.

No estate or interest in real property, other than for leases for a term not exceeding one (1) year, nor any trust or power over or concerning it, or in any manner relating thereto, can be created, granted, assigned, surrendered, or declared, otherwise than by operation of law, or a conveyance or other instrument in writing, subscribed by the party creating, granting, assigning, surrendering or declaring the same, or by his lawful agent thereunto authorized by writing.

Part Performance.

Oral contract under which one party acquired right of way and constructed irrigating ditch over lands of another, under agreement that latter should take fifty inches of water from said ditch annually for irrigation of said lands, will not be held void in action brought by successors in interest of respective parties after lapse of sixteen years. Stowell v. Tucker, 7 Idaho 312, 62 P. 1033 (1900).
Oral contract to convey right to use water for irrigation and domestic purposes, where there has been part performance of contract of sale and possession and use of such water has changed, will be enforced in equity. Francis v. Green, 7 Idaho 668, 65 P. 362 (1901).

Where husband and wife enter into oral contract for sale of their homestead, and purchaser takes possession thereof and pays purchase-price and makes valuable improvements thereon, all of which are done with the full knowledge and consent of wife, purchaser is entitled to specific performance. Grice v. Woodworth, 10 Idaho 459, 80 P. 912 (1904).

Where defendant proceeded under contract to purchase interest in mining claims as though it had been signed by all parties, made payments under it, went into possession, participated in development of property, and, on trial, refused to produce original, it may be inferred that he had signed contract. Ferguson v. Blood, 152 F. 98 (9th Cir. 1907).

Where evidence showed that plaintiff had paid full purchase-price for a one-seventh interest in certain mining claims, or in the net proceeds arising from the working or sale thereof, plaintiff was entitled to specific performance, although contract did not comply with requirements of this section. Coughanour v. Grayson, 19 Idaho 255, 113 P. 724 (1911).

Part performance of oral agreement gives court of equity power to enforce specific performance. Wolf v. Eagleson, 29 Idaho 177, 157 P. 1122 (1916).

Mere giving of check as earnest money in transaction for transfer of real property is not sufficient evidence of purchase in absence of conveyance or other written instrument signed by party to be charged. Schulz v. Hansing, 36 Idaho 121, 209 P. 727 (1922).

Where grantor conveyed property pursuant to prior oral agreement, with agreement that grantee would reconvey after performance of certain conditions and grantee fully performed her part of the agreement, the statute of frauds did not preclude enforcement of the agreement. Chatterton v. Luker, 66 Idaho 242, 158 P.2d 809 (1945).

Oral agreement by which decedent promised to devise certain real estate to plaintiff if she did not file claim against certain estate and “stayed by him” will be enforced by specific performance and is not within the statute of frauds where there is partial or complete performance of the agreement. McMahon v. Auger, 83 Idaho 27, 357 P.2d 374 (1960).

Assuming that an amount of $619.95 originally considered as rental payments had been paid to apply on the purchase price, such payment did not by itself constitute such part performance as to justify specific performance of the oral contract, since it was only a small part of the $25,000 purchase price. Boesiger v. Freer, 85 Idaho 551, 381 P.2d 802 (1963).

Competent evidence may clearly show that possession, after the making of an oral contract, was definitely referable to the contract; however, the possession of land to constitute part performance of a contract which would be invalid under the statute of frauds must be actual, notorious and in pursuance of the contract. Boesiger v. Freer, 85 Idaho 551, 381 P.2d 802 (1963).

Even when a party was entitled to specific performance because his possession after Jan. 1, 1958, was referable to the oral contract under the evidence, the court did not find that it was such a possession as constituted part performance. Boesiger v. Freer, 85 Idaho 551, 381 P.2d 802 (1963).

In order to be considered as constituting part performance of a contract, improvements must be substantial in relation to the value of the property involved. Boesiger v. Freer, 85 Idaho 551, 381 P.2d 802 (1963).
In view of the fact that the trial court did not determine what loss was in fact suffered by respondent as a result of marketing his cattle when he did in reliance on an oral contract, nor whether the legal remedy would be inadequate, the court did not feel that such collateral act under the circumstances in this case should be regarded as part performance. Boesiger v. Freer, 85 Idaho 551, 381 P.2d 802 (1963).

What constitutes part performance must depend upon the particular facts of each case and the sufficiency of particular actions is a matter of law. Boesiger v. Freer, 85 Idaho 551, 381 P.2d 802 (1963).

Where possession is relied upon as part performance to take the case out of the statute of frauds, the taking of the possession is of great importance and the continuance of a possession assumed or commenced before the making of a contract under some right or in some capacity is not such a taking and holding of possession as may alone, or in connection with other acts, be regarded as part performance of the contract. Boesiger v. Freer, 85 Idaho 551, 381 P.2d 802 (1963).

Where there has been full or partial performance of a contract normally within the statute of frauds, such a contract is nonetheless valid where the remedy sought is specific performance. Tew v. Manwaring, 94 Idaho 50, 480 P.2d 896 (1971).

Where practically all the individual terms of the original contract, accord and satisfaction had been performed except the delivery of the deed, the court properly decreed specific performance though the agreement to transfer the real estate was oral. Brown v. Burnside, 94 Idaho 363, 487 P.2d 957 (1971).

Where partial performance has occurred under a contract for the sale of real estate, the trial court has the discretion to compel specific performance, despite the lack of written evidence of the parties’ agreement. Jolley v. Clay, 103 Idaho 171, 646 P.2d 413 (1982).

Where the evidence showed that the purchasers took possession of the property based on an oral contract and lived upon it as owners for 15 years, that they made improvements upon the property valued at $10,000, or roughly the amount of the purchase price, that purchasers paid the taxes on the property from 1964 to 1975, and that they paid $5,500 of the $10,000 purchase price, there was unquestionably part performance sufficient to take the contract out of the statute of frauds. Jolley v. Clay, 103 Idaho 171, 646 P.2d 413 (1982).

Judgment for specific performance of an oral contract to convey land was upheld because there was clear and convincing evidence of the oral agreement, there was partial performance by the brother, and the map of the property was sufficiently drawn to describe the property under the provisions of this section. Thorn Springs Ranch, Inc. v. Smith, 137 Idaho 480, 50 P.3d 975 (2002).

In a dispute regarding an oral agreement for the sale of land between two tenants in common, the part performance exception did not allow for specific performance since the alleged contract was not definite regarding what property was included in the sale. Watson v. Watson, 144 Idaho 214, 159 P.3d 851 (2007).

§ 9-504. Exceptions to preceding section.

The preceding section must not be construed to affect the power of a testator in the disposition of his real property by a last will and testament, nor to prevent any trust from arising or being extinguished by implication or operation of law, nor to abridge the power of any court to compel the specific performance of an agreement, in case of part performance thereof.

Part Performance.

An oral contract for the conveyance of real property or under which the title thereto is acquired may be enforced, is binding upon the parties thereto, and is not within the statute of frauds, where there is partial or complete performance of the same. Stowell v. Tucker, 7 Idaho 312, 62 P. 1033 (1900); Feeney v. Chester, 7 Idaho 324, 63 P. 192 (1900); Male v. Leflang, 7 Idaho 348, 63 P. 108 (1900); Francis v. Green, 7 Idaho 668, 65 P. 362 (1901); Barton v. Dunlap, 8 Idaho 82, 66 P. 832 (1901); Deeds v. Stevens, 8 Idaho 514, 69 P. 534 (1902); Fleming v. Baker, 12 Idaho 346, 85 P. 1092 (1906); Havlick v. Davidson, 15 Idaho 787, 100 P. 91 (1909); King v. Seebeck, 20 Idaho 223, 118 P. 292 (1911); Houser v. Hobart, 22 Idaho 735, 127 P. 997 (1912); Wolf v. Eagleson, 29 Idaho 177, 157 P. 1122 (1916). Part Performance.

The doctrine of part performance has frequently been invoked by lessees against lessors. Fry v. Weyen, 58 Idaho 181, 70 P.2d 359 (1937).

Oral agreement by which decedent promised to devise certain real estate to plaintiff if she did not file claim against certain estate and “stayed by him” will be enforced by specific performance and is not within the statute of frauds, where there is partial or complete performance of the agreement. McMahon v. Auger, 83 Idaho 27, 357 P.2d 374 (1960).

Extension of a lease by oral agreement did not constitute part performance of the option to purchase by a certain time in the original lease so as to take it out of the statute of frauds. Southern v. Southern, 92 Idaho 180, 438 P.2d 925 (1968).

An oral agreement to devise certain land to the owner in consideration of his sale of it to the party for a lower price than he had been offered by others was brought within the exceptions of this section by the owner’s fulfillment of the agreement by sale and conveyance of land as agreed. Quayle v. Mackert, 92 Idaho 563, 447 P.2d 679 (1968).

Where practically all the individual terms of the original contract, accord and satisfaction had been performed except the delivery of the deed, the court properly decreed specific performance though the agreement to transfer the real estate was oral. Brown v. Burnside, 94 Idaho 363, 487 P.2d 957 (1971).

A defendant who is induced to rely on an oral agreement and changes position, through partial performance, to his own detriment cannot be defrauded by a plaintiff who interposes the statute of frauds to declare the agreement invalid. Roundy v. Waner, 98 Idaho 625, 570 P.2d 862 (1977).

Where parents invited their daughter and her husband to purchase certain property and the daughter and her spouse, relying on the oral agreement, made extensive repairs to the property and paid a number of the parents’ debts, their part performance took the transaction out of the statute of frauds and justified the trial court’s decision to quiet title in the daughter and her husband. Roundy v. Waner, 98 Idaho 625, 570 P.2d 862 (1977).

Where partial performance has occurred under a contract for the sale of real estate, the trial court has the discretion to compel specific performance, despite the lack of written evidence of the parties’ agreement. Jolley v. Clay, 103 Idaho 171, 646 P.2d 413 (1982).

Where the evidence showed that the purchasers took possession of the property based on an oral contract and lived upon it as owners for 15 years, that they made improvements upon the property valued at $10,000, or roughly the amount of the purchase price, that purchasers paid the taxes on the property from 1964 to 1975, and that they paid $5,500 of the $10,000 purchase price, there was unquestionably part performance sufficient to take the contract out of the statute of frauds. Jolley v. Clay, 103 Idaho 171, 646 P.2d 413 (1982).

Although§ 9-503 requires that a conveyance of real property must be in writing, this section provides an exception to the rule so long as partial acceptance has occurred. Thus, where it was undisputed that plaintiffs had taken possession of the disputed property under oral agreement, exercised exclusive control over it for approximately three years, made substantial improvements thereon and paid most of the purchase price, vendors were estopped from raising the statute of frauds as a defense to liability under the agreement. Mikesell v. Newworld Dev. Corp., 122 Idaho 868, 840 P.2d 1090 (Ct. App. 1992).
The evidence produced by an occupant of land did not establish the essential terms of an oral lease with sufficient definiteness and certainty so as to avoid the strictures of the statute of frauds, nor was the part performance of the agreement sufficient, as a matter of law, to justify the equitable remedy of specific enforcement. Wing v. Munns, 123 Idaho 493, 849 P.2d 954 (Ct. App. 1993).

As a consequence of§ 9-503, this section and§ 9-505(5), where alleged part performance can be explained as consistent with some other purpose or arrangement, an oral contract to sell will not be established; therefore, where evidence indicated tenants/alleged purchasers did not take any action regarding the premises other than moving in and operating the bakery, made monthly payments consistent with rental, and made no valuable improvements to premises with repairs being made by landlord/alleged vendors, no clear and convincing evidence existed to support existence of an oral contract to sell. Hinkle v. Winey, 126 Idaho 993, 895 P.2d 594 (Ct. App. 1995).

Doctrine of part performance could not make an oral contract for the purchase of real property subject to specific enforcement, where the absence of a meeting of the minds on a material provision supported the conclusion that no contract had been formed by the parties. Chapin v. Linden, 144 Idaho 393, 162 P.3d 772 (2007).

This section provides for a part-performance exception only to the general statute of frauds provisions of§ 9-503. It has no application to the statutes regulating real estate brokers and agents found in Title 54, Chapter 20, Idaho Code. Johnson v. McPhee, 147 Idaho 455, 210 P.3d 563 (Ct. App. 2009).

§ 9-505. Certain agreements to be in writing.

In the following cases the agreement is invalid, unless the same or some note or memorandum thereof, be in writing and subscribed by the party charged, or by his agent. Evidence, therefore, of the agreement cannot be received without the writing or secondary evidence of its contents:

An agreement that by its terms is not to be performed within a year from the making thereof.

A special promise to answer for the debt, default or miscarriage of another, except in the cases provided for in section 9-506, Idaho Code.

An agreement made upon consideration of marriage, other than a mutual promise to marry.

An agreement for the leasing, for a longer period than one (1) year, or for the sale, of real property, or of an interest therein, and such agreement, if made by an agent of the party sought to be charged, is invalid, unless the authority of the agent be in writing, subscribed by the party sought to be charged.

A promise or commitment to lend money or to grant or extend credit in an original principal amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more, made by a person or entity engaged in the business of lending money or extending credit.

Part Performance.

“Part” performance means performance by either or both parties of less than all their respective obligations under the contract. Frantz v. Parke, 111 Idaho 1005, 729 P.2d 1068 (Ct. App. 1986).

Doctrine of part performance was not applicable where lease did not implicate the statute of frauds. Lawrence v. Jones, 124 Idaho 748, 864 P.2d 194 (Ct. App. 1993).

As a consequence of§§ 9-503, 9-504 and this section, where alleged part performance can be explained as consistent with some other purpose or arrangement, an oral contract to sell will not be established; therefore, where evidence indicated tenants/alleged purchasers did not take any action regarding the premises other than moving in and operating the bakery, made monthly payments consistent with rental, and made no valuable improvements to premises with repairs being made by landlord/alleged vendors, no clear and convincing evidence existed to support existence of an oral contract to sell. Hinkle v. Winey, 126 Idaho 993, 895 P.2d 594 (Ct. App. 1995).

§ 9-506. Original obligations — Writing not needed.

A promise to answer for the obligation of another, in any of the following cases, is deemed an original obligation of the promisor, and need not be in writing:

Where the promise is made by one who has received property of another upon an undertaking to apply it pursuant to such promise; or by one who has received a discharge from an obligation in whole or in part, in consideration of such promise.

Where the creditor parts with value, or enters into an obligation, in consideration of the obligations in respect to which the promise is made, in terms or under circumstances such as to render the party making the promise the principal debtor, and the person in whose behalf it is made, his surety.

Where the promise, being for an antecedent obligation of another, is made upon the consideration that the party receiving it cancels the antecedent obligation, accepting the new promise as a substitute therefor; or upon the consideration that the party receiving it releases the property of another from a levy, or his person from imprisonment under an execution on a judgment obtained upon the antecedent obligation; or upon a consideration beneficial to the promisor, whether moving from either party to the antecedent obligation, or from another person.

Where a factor undertakes, for a commission, to sell merchandise and guarantee the sale.

Where the holder of an instrument for the payment of money, upon which a third person is, or may become, liable to him, transfers it in payment of a precedent debt of his own, or for a new consideration and in connection with such transfer, enters into a promise respecting such instrument.

§ 9-507. Representations of credit to be in writing.

No evidence is admissible to charge a person upon a representation as to the credit of a third person, unless such representation, or some memorandum thereof, be in writing, and either subscribed by, or in the handwriting of, the party to be charged.

§ 9-508. Real estate commission contracts to be in writing.

No contract for the payment of any sum of money or thing of value, as and for a commission or reward for the finding or procuring by one person of a purchaser of real estate of another shall be valid unless the same shall be in writing, signed by the owner of such real estate, or his legal, appointed and duly qualified representative.